incubator/apertium-hi.hi_WX.dix
    <pardef n="KA/__v">
      <e><p><l>Uz</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ye</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iye</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ie</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ye</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yeM</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ez</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iye</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ie</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yeM</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ez</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ne</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nIM</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>we</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wIM</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ye</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>I</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>IM</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yIM</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:any"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kara</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:any"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>UzgA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>egA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yegA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iegA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyegA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>egA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yegA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezge</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yeMge</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oge</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iegA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyegA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezge</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yeMge</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>UzgI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>egI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yegI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iegA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyegA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>egI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yegI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezgI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yeMgI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ogI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iegA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyegA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezgI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yeMgI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="aGA"><i>aGA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="A"><i>A</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="akulA"><i>akulA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="apanA"><i>apanA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="aXikA"><i>aXikA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="azjA"><i>azjA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="bacA"><i>bacA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="BadakA"><i>BadakA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="bahakA"><i>bahakA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="bajavA"><i>bajavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="baMxA"><i>baMxA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="BannA"><i>BannA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="BaravA"><i>BaravA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="basA"><i>basA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="bawalA"><i>bawalA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="baztavA"><i>baztavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="belavA"><i>belavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="bicakA"><i>bicakA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="BijavA"><i>BijavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="BinaBinA"><i>BinaBinA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="bixakA"><i>bixakA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="bolavA"><i>bolavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="BugawA"><i>BugawA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="bulavA"><i>bulavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="bunavA"><i>bunavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="caDA"><i>caDA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="CakA"><i>CakA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="CalakA"><i>CalakA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="camakA"><i>camakA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="CapA"><i>CapA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="catA"><i>catA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="cidacidA"><i>cidacidA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="CinavA"><i>CinavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="CiwarA"><i>CiwarA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="cuBA"><i>cuBA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="culabulA"><i>culabulA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="dabadabA"><i>dabadabA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="DahA"><i>DahA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="dalavA"><i>dalavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="digA"><i>digA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="DulavA"><i>DulavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="gadagadA"><i>gadagadA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="gaharA"><i>gaharA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="GatA"><i>GatA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="gazvA"><i>gazvA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="ginavA"><i>ginavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="GulA"><i>GulA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="gurrA"><i>gurrA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="hadakA"><i>hadakA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="harA"><i>harA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="haWiyA"><i>haWiyA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="hilA"><i>hilA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="iwarA"><i>iwarA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="jA"><i>jA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="JalamalA"><i>JalamalA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="jamA"><i>jamA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="JapadiyA"><i>JapadiyA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="JilamilA"><i>JilamilA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="juJA"><i>juJA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="JulavA"><i>JulavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="JuTalA"><i>JuTalA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="kacakA"><i>kacakA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="KadakA"><i>KadakA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="KA"><i>KA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="KanakA"><i>KanakA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="karA"><i>karA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="KataKatA"><i>KataKatA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="KilaKilA"><i>KilaKilA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="kuDA"><i>kuDA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="kurakurA"><i>kurakurA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="lahalahA"><i>lahalahA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="lapatA"><i>lapatA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="liKA"><i>liKA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="luBA"><i>luBA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="manA"><i>manA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="mazgavA"><i>mazgavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="milA"><i>milA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="mitA"><i>mitA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="nacA"><i>nacA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="oDA"><i>oDA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="pagA"><i>pagA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="paraparA"><i>paraparA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="PazsA"><i>PazsA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="pilavA"><i>pilavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="PulA"><i>PulA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="raKavA"><i>raKavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="sadA"><i>sadA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="SaramA"><i>SaramA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="silavA"><i>silavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="surasurA"><i>surasurA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="TakaTakA"><i>TakaTakA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="timatimA"><i>timatimA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="ugalavA"><i>ugalavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="uTA"><i>uTA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="wakA"><i>wakA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="WarrA"><i>WarrA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="WukA"><i>WukA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="XakaXakA"><i>XakaXakA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="XazsA"><i>XazsA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="xularA"><i>xularA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
